Maine, session 132, LD1533.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE
Educational and General Activities - UMS 0031
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to employ, as research assistants or teaching assistants,
25 graduate students per year in research graduate programs, until each student completes
the student's program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,686,441 $5,372,883
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,686,441 $5,372,883